Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1471.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-231.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-231.01. School mapping data program; fund; grants; software and data requirements; annual certification; public records exemption; definition A. The school mapping data program is established in the department to facilitate efficient emergency responses on school campuses by ensuring that school mapping data is accurate, standardized and accessible to public safety agencies.  The department shall develop standardized school mapping data program requirements and guidelines, including requirements that do all of the following: 1. Ensure that The school mapping data software: (a) Is compatible with software platforms used by local, state and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to schools in this state. (b) Does Not require a public safety agency to purchase additional software or pay a fee to view or access the school mapping data. (c) Includes school mapping data in a printable format. (d) Does Not allow the school mapping data for a school site to be modified or updated without updating the school mapping data for the school site within each platform that is used by a local, state or federal public safety agency that may provide emergency services to the school site. 2. Ensure that The school mapping data is oriented true north, overlaid with gridded x and y coordinates and includes all of the following: (a) Accurate floor plans overlaid on current, verified aerial images of the school campus. (b) Site-specific labels that match the structure of each school building, including room labels, hallway names, external door numbers and stairwell numbers. (c) Site-specific labels that match the school grounds, including parking areas, athletic fields, roadways and neighboring properties. (d) The location of each critical utility, key box, automated external defibrillator and trauma kit and any known hazard at each school site. 3. Ensure that if a school contracts with a vendor to produce school mapping data pursuant to this section, the contract includes provisions ensuring both of the following: (a) That public safety agencies and the school will have perpetual access to all school mapping data at no additional cost. (b) That each contractor that produces school mapping data will verify the accuracy of the data by conducting a walk-through of all school buildings and school grounds that are included in the data. B. Each school that receives grant monies pursuant to subsection D of this section shall: 1. Develop school mapping data consistent with the school mapping data program requirements established pursuant to subsection A of this section for each school site that is operated by the school. 2. Annually review school mapping data for each school site and either: (a) Certify to the department that the school mapping data is complete and accurate and meets the school mapping data program requirements established pursuant to subsection A of this section. (b) Update the school mapping data to ensure that it is complete and accurate and meets the school mapping data program requirements established pursuant to subsection A of this section. 3. Annually provide the school mapping data for each school site to each local, state and federal public safety agency that may provide emergency services to the school. C. School mapping data that is produced pursuant to this section is not a public record, is exempt from title 39, chapter 1 and is not subject to public disclosure. D. The school mapping data program fund is established consisting of monies appropriated by the legislature and grants, gifts, devises and donations from any public or private source. The department may accept and spend federal monies, private grants, gifts, contributions and devises to assist in carrying out the purposes of this section.  The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations.  Each school in this state may apply for a grant in a form and manner prescribed by the department.  The department shall distribute grants from the school mapping data program fund to eligible schools in this state on a first-come, first-served basis.  A school that receives grant monies pursuant to this subsection shall use the monies for the costs of developing school mapping data pursuant to subsection B of this section. E. For the purposes of this section, "school" means a public school in this state that offers instruction to students in a kindergarten program or any of grades one through twelve. END_STATUTE